Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-1651
District; withdrawal; petition; signatures required; hearing; notice; resolution of county board; obligation of district; effect.

(1) A petition to withdraw real property from a district may be filed:

(a) By persons that own not less than twenty-five percent of the territory in an area that is proposed to be withdrawn; and

(b) If special assessments have been or will be imposed in such district.

(2) A petition described in subsection (1) of this section shall be filed with the county clerk.

(3) If a petition is filed pursuant to this section, the board shall set a time and place for a hearing pursuant to sections 39-1641 and 39-1642. At the hearing the board may pass a resolution permitting the withdrawal of the proposed territory.

(4) Any area withdrawn from the district shall be subject to assessment and be otherwise chargeable for the payment and discharge of all the obligations outstanding at the time of filing the petition for withdrawal.

(5) An area withdrawn from a district shall not be subject to assessment or otherwise chargeable for any obligations of any nature or kind incurred after the time of filing the petition for withdrawal of the area from the district.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 14, p. 685;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 63.
July 18, 2026